Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4153.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 28, chapter 2, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 28-377, to read: START_STATUTE28-377. Annual report; motor vehicle division wait times; vehicle registration by mail turnaround times On or before July 31 of each year, the DEPARTMENT shall report to the Joint legislative budget committee on the progress in IMPROVING motor vehicle division wait times and vehicle REGISTRATION renewal by mail turnaround times. The report shall be in a format that is similar to the report the DEPARTMENT submitted to the joint LEGISLATIVE budget committee before the effective date of this section. END_STATUTE